Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $125,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $125,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for a grant to the Minnesota County Attorneys Association to be used for prosecutorial and law enforcement training, including trial school training and train-the-trainer courses. $125,000 for this activity is added to the base in fiscal year 2028 and thereafter. new text end